Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.076

Rape of a child in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of rape of a child in the second degree when the person has sexual intercourse with another who is at least twelve years old but less than fourteen years old and the perpetrator is at least thirty-six months older than the victim.

(2) Rape of a child in the second degree is a class A felony.

[ 2021 c 142 s 3; 1990 c 3 s 903; 1988 c 145 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 142: See note following RCW 9A.44.050.

Effective date—Savings—Application—1988 c 145: See notes following RCW 9A.44.010.